Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2506
Tracts of land; how described.

(1) Descriptions of tracts of land by reference to subdivisions, lines or corners of the United States Public Land Survey System or other original pertinent surveys, are recognized as the basic and prevailing method for describing tracts of land. Whenever coordinates of the Nebraska Plane Coordinate System are used in descriptions of tracts of land, they shall be construed as being supplementary to such descriptions. In the event of any conflict, coordinates of the Nebraska Plane Coordinate System shall not determine the issue, but may be used as collateral facts to show additional evidence.

(2) Descriptions of tracts of land shall not be described entirely by coordinates of the Nebraska Plane Coordinate System or any other plane coordinate system.

(3) Nothing in this section requires a purchaser, mortgagee, or insurer of real property to rely on a land description, any part of which depends exclusively upon the Nebraska Plane Coordinate System.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 68;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1606;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 502;

Laws 2024, LB102, § 15.